Wyoming, session 2026, HB0111.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) As used in this act:
(i) "Appropriation" means the authorizations granted by
the legislature under this act to make expenditures from and to
incur obligations against the general and other funds as
specified;
(ii) "FF" means federal funds;
(iii) "Major maintenance" means as defined by W.S.
9-2-3001(b)(ix);
(iv) "PR" means private funding sources;
(v) "SR" means an agency's account within the special
revenue fund;
(vi) "S0" means other funds identified by footnote;
(vii) "This appropriation," when used in a footnote in
this act, shall be construed as a reference to that portion of the
appropriated funds identified in the footnote.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0111
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) Appropriations for projects in this act remain in effect
until the project is completed, unless otherwise provided. The
amounts appropriated for projects in this act shall be expended
only on the projects specified and any unexpended, unobligated
funds remaining upon completion of a project shall revert to the
accounts from which they were appropriated, unless otherwise
provided. The amounts appropriated in this act are intended to
provide a maximum amount for each project from any source,
excluding contingency funding, and shall not be construed to be an
entitlement or guaranteed amount. This subsection shall not apply
to appropriations for major maintenance in this act, except as
specifically provided.
[CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION]
Section 2.
(a) The following sums of money are appropriated for the
capital construction projects specified:
(i) Appropriations and authorization for projects
administered through the state construction department:
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0111
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 027. CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS
PROGRAM
SCD - Level I/II 1. 1,200,000 1,200,000
SBC - Contingency 5,962,485 5,962,485
MIL – WYARNG Modernization 5,000,000 5,000,000 10,000,000
MIL - WYARNG Trng. Brrcks. 42,000,000 42,000,000
AGR - Fair Show Ctr. Floor 2,000,000 PR 2,000,000
DOH - VHW Remodel 2., 3. 87,000,000 87,000,000
LCCC - Auto Tech. Reno. 4,435,824 PR 4,435,824
LCCC – Science Ctr. Reno. 4,397,855 3,546,658 PR 7,944,513
LCCC – Crossroads Bldg. Reno. 4,298,887 3,466,844 PR 7,765,731
LCCC - Comm. Ctr. Reno. 4,178,114 3,369,447 PR 7,547,561
NWCCD - Science Bldg. Reno 15,194,676 12,253,775 PR 27,448,451
CWC - Indust. Fac. Reno. 4,086,049 PR 4,086,049
CWC – Jackson 4. 750,000 750,000 PR 1,500,000
GCCD - Enzi Center 5. 6,000,000 6,000,000 PR 12,000,000
TOTALS 133,982,017 47,000,000 39,908,597 220,890,614
1. (a) This appropriation is for level I, level II and master plan studies,
including any combination thereof, for the following projects:
(i) Department of agriculture – state fair dormitories;
(ii) Office of state lands and investments, division of forestry -
facilities in or near Newcastle, Wyoming;
(iii) Wyoming community college commission – industrial technology
building at Casper college;
(iv) Wyoming community college commission – health science
facility at Casper college.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after funds are
obligated for all studies specified in subsection (a) of this footnote, any
remaining unobligated funds from this appropriation are authorized for
expenditure on any level I, level II and master plan studies approved by the
state building commission.
2. The state construction department is authorized to retain a qualified
owner's representative for the veterans' home of Wyoming remodel. From this
general fund appropriation, the department may expend an amount not to exceed
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0111
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) for retention of the qualified
owner's representative.
3. (a) Federal funds received by the state of Wyoming for state run veterans'
home facilities shall:
(i) Be deposited to the legislative stabilization reserve account
in an equivalent amount of expended general funds to the extent funds from this
appropriation have been expended; and
(ii) Reduce this appropriation by one dollar ($1.00) for each one
dollar ($1.00) in federal funds for any remaining federal funds received in
excess of the amount deposited to the legislative stabilization reserve account
in accordance with this footnote.
4. Expenditures of this general fund appropriation shall be conditioned upon
matching funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated funds from
the general fund to not less than one dollar ($1.00) from private funding
sources from any other source from the requesting community college.
5. (a) This appropriation is for the development and construction of the Enzi
applied learning center at Gillette college, provided that:
(i) Funds from this appropriation shall not be expended unless
Gillette college provides for a levy of four (4) mills in accordance with W.S.
21-18-205(a)(ii);
(ii) Funds from this general fund appropriation shall be
conditioned upon matching funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of
appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) from any
nonstate source.
(ii) Appropriations and authorization for projects
administered through the department of state parks and cultural
resources:
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0111
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 024. CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS
PROGRAM
SPCR - Outdoor Rec. 6,600,000 SR 6,600,000
SPCR – Terr. Prison 250,000 SR 250,000
SPCR – Water Fac. 430,000 SR 430,000
SPCR - Quebec 01 Fac. 50,000 SR 50,000
TOTALS 7,330,000 7,330,000
[MAJOR MAINTENANCE FUNDING FOR STATE FACILITIES, STATE PARKS AND
CULTURAL RESOURCES, UNIVERSITY AND COMMUNITY COLLEGES]
Section 3.
(a) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2026, and subject to
W.S. 9-4-207(d)(iv), there is appropriated two hundred thirty-
three million three hundred fifty-four thousand nine hundred
forty‑three dollars ($233,354,943.00) from the general fund for
major maintenance to the entities and in the amounts specified as
provided in this subsection. This appropriation shall be
distributed as follows:
(i) Thirty-seven and six tenths percent (37.6%) to the
state construction department for state buildings, facilities and
sites managed by the state building commission and state
institutions;
(ii) Seven and ninety‑nine hundredths percent (7.99%)
to the department of state parks and cultural resources to fund
major maintenance requests submitted by the department of state
parks and cultural resources as approved by the state building
commission;
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0111
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Thirty-six and thirty-four hundredths
percent (36.34%) to the University of Wyoming for
university buildings, facilities and sites, excluding
student housing, the student union and auxiliary services
areas, the latter being those areas funded by university
self-sustaining revenues;
(iv) Eighteen and seven hundredths percent
(18.07%) to the state construction department for community
college district buildings, facilities and sites.
[WYOMING STATE PENITENTIARY CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT -
APPROPRIATION AMENDMENTS]
Section 4.
(a) 2023 Session Laws, Chapter 187, Section 10(a) by
creating a new paragraph (iv) and by creating a new
subsection (c) is amended to read:
Section 10.
(a) There is appropriated an amount not to
exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) from
the Wyoming state penitentiary capital
construction account to the state construction
department for, in consultation with the
department of corrections:
(iv) Acquiring land for a future state
penitentiary under subsection (c) of this
section.
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0111
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) Prior to the acquisition of land under
paragraph (a)(iv) of this section the state
construction department shall consult with the
office of state lands and investments and the
department of corrections to identify and
evaluate potential land acquisitions taking into
account location, price, geotechnical conditions,
soil quality and any other factors determined
relevant by the department of corrections and the
office of state lands and investments. Any land
acquisitions under this section shall be subject
to approval of the state building commission.
(b) 2023 Session Laws, Chapter 187, Section 10(b) is
repealed.
[WYOMING STATE SHOOTING COMPLEX]
Section 5.
(a) As used in this section, "Wyoming state shooting
complex" means a facility located in Park county, near
Cody, that is described in the state shooting complex
development and oversight task force final recommendation
that was submitted to the governor, the joint
appropriations committee and the joint travel, recreation,
wildlife and cultural resources interim committee, dated
August 8, 2024.
(b) From the unexpended, unobligated balance of the
state shooting complex account appropriated under 2023
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 146, Section 3(a)(ii) and the
expenditure of which requires additional action of the
legislature, up to two million five hundred thousand
dollars ($2,500,000.00), or as much thereof as is
7

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0111
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
available, is hereby authorized for expenditure in
accordance with this section.
(c) From the unexpended, unobligated balance of the
state shooting complex account appropriated under 2023
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 146, Section 3(a)(iii) and
the expenditure of which requires additional action of the
legislature, up to two million five hundred thousand
dollars ($2,500,000.00), or as much thereof as is
available, is hereby authorized for expenditure in
accordance with this section.
(d) Notwithstanding 2023 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 146, Section 3(b), funds authorized for expenditure
under this section shall be expended, without delay and as
directed by the Wyoming state shooting complex joint powers
board through the department of state parks and cultural
resources, for costs related to the Wyoming state shooting
complex that are described in and subject to the terms of a
memorandum of understanding between the Wyoming state
shooting complex joint powers board and the department of
state parks and cultural resources executed on September 3,
2025.
(e) Funds authorized for expenditure under this
section shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-
4-207, the authority to expend funds under this section
shall remain in effect and not lapse at the end of the
fiscal period except upon further legislative action. Funds
authorized for expenditure under this section shall be
reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for every one dollar ($1.00)
appropriated to the state shooting complex account in 2026
House Bill 0001 or Senate File 0001, if enacted into law.
8

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0111
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(f) Any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining in
the state shooting complex account from appropriations
under 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 146, Section 3(a)
and not otherwise authorized for expenditure under this
section shall revert to the accounts from which they were
appropriated.
[EFFECTIVE DATE]
Section 6. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
9